Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.290

Dedication of county land for streets and alleys.

The boards of county commissioners of the several counties may dedicate any county land to public use for public streets and alleys in any city or town.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.290. Prior: 1903 c 89 s 1; RRS s 4026.]